Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-131
University funds; disbursements; how made.

Disbursements from the university funds shall be made by the State Treasurer upon warrants drawn by the Director of Administrative Services who shall issue warrants upon certificates issued as authorized by the Board of Regents.

Laws 1875, § 4, p. 155;

R.S.1913, § 7108;

C.S.1922, § 6740;

C.S.1929, § 85-126;

R.S.1943, § 85-131;

Laws 1979, LB 194, § 2;

Laws 2003, LB 68, § 6.

Funds herein can be expended only by the Board of Regents. Board of Regents v. Exon, 199 Neb. 146, 256 N.W.2d 330 (1977).

By this section, it is unnecessary to authorize disbursement of income from trust funds by Board of Regents. State ex rel. Ledwith v. Brian, 84 Neb. 30, 120 N.W. 916 (1909).